Utah statutes.
58-77-601.   Standards of practice.

(1) (a)  Prior to providing any services, a licensed Direct-entry midwife must obtain an informed consent from a client.

(b)  The consent must include:

(i)  the name and license number of the Direct-entry midwife;

(ii)  the client's name, address, telephone number, and primary care provider, if the client has one;

(iii)  the fact, if true, that the licensed Direct-entry midwife is not a certified nurse midwife or a physician;

(iv)  a description of the licensed Direct-entry midwife's education, training, continuing education, and experience in midwifery;

(v)  a description of the licensed Direct-entry midwife's peer review process;

(vi)  the licensed Direct-entry midwife's philosophy of practice;

(vii)  a promise to provide the client, upon request, separate documents describing the rules governing licensed Direct-entry midwifery practice, including a list of conditions indicating the need for consultation, collaboration, referral, transfer or mandatory transfer, and the licensed Direct-entry midwife's personal written practice guidelines;

(viii)  a medical back-up or transfer plan;

(ix)  a description of the services provided to the client by the licensed Direct-entry midwife;

(x)  the licensed Direct-entry midwife's current legal status;

(xi)  the availability of a grievance process;

(xii)  client and licensed Direct-entry midwife signatures and the date of signing; and

(xiii)  whether the licensed Direct-entry midwife is covered by a professional liability insurance policy.

(2)  A licensed Direct-entry midwife shall:

(a) (i)  limit the licensed Direct-entry midwife's practice to a normal pregnancy, labor, postpartum, newborn and interconceptual care, which for purposes of this section means a normal labor:

(A)  that is not pharmacologically induced;

(B)  that is low risk at the start of labor;

(C)  that remains low risk through out the course of labor and delivery;

(D)  in which the infant is born spontaneously in the vertex position between 37 and 43 completed weeks of pregnancy; and

(E)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), in which after delivery, the mother and infant remain low risk; and

(ii)  the limitation of Subsection (2)(a)(i) does not prohibit a licensed Direct-entry midwife from delivering an infant when there is:

(A)  intrauterine fetal demise; or

(B)  a fetal anomaly incompatible with life; and

(b)  appropriately recommend and facilitate consultation with, collaboration with, referral to, or transfer or mandatory transfer of care to a licensed health care professional when the circumstances require that action in accordance with this section and standards established by division rule.

(3)  If after a client has been informed that she has or may have a condition indicating the need for medical consultation, collaboration, referral, or transfer and the client chooses to decline, then the licensed Direct-entry midwife shall:

(a)  terminate care in accordance with procedures established by division rule; or

(b)  continue to provide care for the client if the client signs a waiver of medical consultation, collaboration, referral, or transfer.

(4)  If after a client has been informed that she has or may have a condition indicating the need for mandatory transfer, the licensed Direct-entry midwife shall, in accordance with procedures established by division rule, terminate the care or initiate transfer by:

(a)  calling 911 and reporting the need for immediate transfer;

(b)  immediately transporting the client by private vehicle to the receiving provider; or

(c)  contacting the physician to whom the client will be transferred and following that physician's orders.

(5)  The standards for consultation and transfer under Subsection 58-77-204(4) are the minimum standards that a licensed Direct-entry midwife must follow.  A licensed Direct-entry midwife shall initiate consultation, collaboration, referral, or transfer of a patient sooner than required by Subsection 58-77-204(4) or administrative rule if in the opinion and experience of the licensed Direct-entry midwife, the condition of the client or infant warrant a consultation, collaboration, referral, or transfer.

(6)  For the period from 2006 through 2011, a licensed Direct-entry midwife must submit outcome data to the Midwives' Alliance of North America's Division of Research on the form and in the manner prescribed by rule.

(7)  This chapter does not mandate health insurance coverage for midwifery services.



Amended by Chapter 365, 2008 General Session

